Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.530

Notice of change of ownership or management.

At least sixty days before the effective date of any change of ownership, change of operating entity, or change of management of a nursing home, the current operating entity shall notify separately and in writing, each resident of the home or the resident's guardian of the proposed change. The notice shall include the identity of the proposed new owner, operating entity, or managing entity and the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of departmental personnel to whom comments regarding the change may be directed. If the proposed new owner, operating entity, or managing entity is a corporation, the notice shall include the names of all officers and the registered agent in the state of Washington. If the proposed new owner, operating entity, or managing entity is a partnership, the notice shall include the names of all general partners. This section shall apply regardless of whether the current operating entity holds a medicaid provider contract with the department and whether the operating entity intends to enter such a contract.

[ 1987 c 476 s 22.]